Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 1. Transition Provisions.

§ 16.1-69.1.
Repealing clause.

All acts and parts of acts, all sections of this Code, and all provisions of municipal charters, inconsistent with the provisions of this title, as amended, are, except as herein otherwise provided, repealed to the extent of such inconsistency.

History.

1972, c. 708; 1973, c. 546.

The numbers of §§

16.1-69.1

through

16.1-69.52

were assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the numbers in the 1972 act having been 16.1-1.1 through 16.1-1.52.

Cross references.

For constitutional provision as to authority of General Assembly with regard to courts, see Va. Const., Art. IV, § 14.

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 16. Miscellaneous Proceedings. § 16.05 General District Courts. Bryson.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 1. Courts. § 1.05 District Courts. Friend.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5A M.J. Courts, §§ 41, 43.

§ 16.1-69.2.
Effect of repeal of Title 16 and amendment of Title 16.1.

The repeal of Title 16 effective as of July 1, 1956, and amendment of Title 16.1 effective as of July 1, 1973, shall not affect any act or offense done or committed, or any penalty or forfeiture incurred, or any right established, accrued or accruing on or before such day, or any prosecution, suit or action pending on that day. Every such pending prosecution, suit and action shall be proceeded in, tried and determined in the same court, or in the court which succeeds to or has its jurisdiction, and any further action taken therein shall be valid and effective for all purposes, whether taken by the court in its present or former name or by the judge thereof under his present or former judicial title. All further proceedings therein shall conform, as far as practicable, to the provisions of Title 16.1, as amended.

History.

1956, c. 555; 1972, c. 708; 1973, c. 546.

Editor’s note.

Formerly, this section was not set out in the Code of Virginia. At its April 4, 2017, meeting, the Virginia Code Commission approved setting out the full text.

§ 16.1-69.3.
Certain notices, recognizances and processes validated.

Any notice given, recognizance taken, or process or writ issued before July 1, 1973, shall be valid although given, taken or to be returned to a day after such date, or to a court established by this title or the clerk’s office thereof, in like manner as if this title, as amended, had been effective before the same was given, taken or issued.

History.

1956, c. 555; 1972, c. 708; 1973, c. 546.

Editor’s note.

Formerly, this section was not set out in the Code of Virginia. At its April 4, 2017, meeting, the Virginia Code Commission approved setting out the full text.

§ 16.1-69.4.
References to former sections, articles or chapters of Title 16 or Title 16.1 as amended.

Whenever in this title any of the conditions, requirements, provisions or contents of any section, article or chapter of Title 16, as such title existed prior to July 1, 1956, or Title 16.1, as such title existed prior to July 1, 1973, are transferred in the same or in modified form to a new section, article or chapter, and whenever such former section, article or chapter is given a new number in this title, all references to any such former section, article or chapter of Title 16 or Title 16.1 appearing elsewhere in this Code other than in this title shall be construed to apply to the new or renumbered section, article or chapter containing such conditions, requirements, provisions or contents or portions thereof.

History.

1956, c. 555; 1972, c. 708; 1973, c. 546.

Editor’s note.

Formerly, this section was not set out in the Code of Virginia. At its April 4, 2017, meeting, the Virginia Code Commission approved setting out the full text.

§ 16.1-69.5.
Meaning of certain terms.

Unless the context should otherwise require, the terms set out in this section shall be construed as follows:

“Courts not of record” shall mean all courts in the Commonwealth below the jurisdictional level of the circuit courts including general district courts and juvenile and domestic relations district courts;

“General district courts” shall mean all courts not of record, except juvenile and domestic relations district courts in counties and cities heretofore designated as county and municipal courts;

“Juvenile and domestic relations district courts” shall mean all courts in counties and cities heretofore designated as juvenile and domestic relations courts or regional juvenile and domestic relations courts;

“District courts” shall mean general district courts and juvenile and domestic relations district courts;

“County courts” and “municipal courts” shall be deemed to refer to general district courts;

“Juvenile and domestic relations courts” and “regional juvenile and domestic relations courts” shall be deemed to refer to juvenile and domestic relations district courts; and

“Chief judge” shall mean that judge so designated for a term to assume primary administrative responsibility for the general district courts or the juvenile and domestic relations district courts in the district served by such judge.

History.

1972, c. 708; 1973, c. 546; 1975, c. 334.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

Law Review.

For essay, see “Terminating Parental Rights through a Backdoor in the Virginia Code: Adoptions Under section

63.2-1202

(H),” 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 371 (2013).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2A M.J. Attachment and Garnishment, § 24; 5A M.J. Courts, §§ 41, 44.